Massachusetts, session 194th, H1166.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
2 3 sections: 
3  Section 63. As used in sections 63 to 65, inclusive, the following words shall, unless the 
4 context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:- 
5  "Motor vehicle" shall: (1) have the same meaning as in section 1 of chapter 90; (2) have a 
6 gross weight rating of 10,000 pounds or less; and (3) shall not include a “commercial motor 
7 vehicle” as defined in section 1 of chapter 90F. 
8  “Rental facilitator", any person having any right, access, ability, or authority to offer, 
9 reserve, book, arrange for, remarket, distribute, broker, resell, coordinate, or otherwise facilitate 
10 rental of a motor vehicle to a renter, whether directly or indirectly, through an Internet 
11 transaction or any other means whatsoever. 

2 of 15 12  “Vehicle rental transaction”, the transfer of possession of a motor vehicle, for a 
13 consideration, without the transfer of ownership of such motor vehicle, whether directly or 
14 indirectly, through a rental facilitator or otherwise.  
15  Section 64. (a) Vehicle rental transactions shall be subject to all statutory and regulatory 
16 obligations for private passenger motor vehicle rental vehicles, transactions, and companies 
17 including, but not limited to compliance with sections 11 and 12, section 20E, section 32C 
18 section 32,  section 32E1/2,  section 32E3/4, section 32E7/8 of chapter 90; section 2 of chapter 
19 64I  and section 92A of chapter 266. 
20  (b) If the rental of a motor vehicle is offered, reserved, booked, arranged for, or otherwise 
21 facilitated in whole or in part by a rental facilitator, the rental facilitator shall: (i) demand and 
22 collect all applicable taxes and fees from the renter, and (ii) shall remit the tax to the state.  If a 
23 rental facilitator required to collect and remit a tax under this chapter fails to make a return, no 
24 assessment shall be made except against the rental facilitator. 
25  Section 65. (a) Rental facilitators, upon request of an airport, including but not limited to 
26 any entity responsible for regulating commerce at such airport within the commonwealth, enter 
27 into an agreement, which agreement may be a concession agreement, prior to: (i) listing, 
28 publishing or advertising rental vehicles parked on airport property or at airport facilities; (ii) 
29 facilitating the rental of vehicles to transport airport customers to or from airport property or 
30 airport facilities, regardless of whether that use is to be initiated on or off of airport property or 
31 airport facilities; or (iii) promoting or marketing the rental of vehicles to transport airport 
32 customers to or from airport property or airport facilities, regardless of whether that 
33 transportation is to be initiated on or off of airport property or airport facilities. 

3 of 15 34  (b) The agreement described in subsection (a) shall set forth the same or reasonably 
35 similar standards, regulations, procedures, fees, and access requirements applicable to all vehicle 
36 rental transactions conducted at airport. 
37  (c) If a rental facilitator: (i) fails or refuses to enter into an agreement described in 
38 subsection (a) after request by an airport, or (ii) performs, participates in, or undertakes any of 
39 the actions set forth in subsection (a) before entering into an agreement described in said 
40 subsection (a) after request by an airport, the affected airport may seek an injunction prohibiting 
41 operations at the airport and may also seek damages against rental facilitator. 
42  SECTION 2.  Subsection (a) of section 168 of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as most 
43 recently amended by section 79 of chapter 358 of the acts of 2020, is hereby amended by striking 
44 out the definitions of “Personal vehicle sharing” and "Personal vehicle sharing program”. 
45  SECTION 3.  Subsection (b) of said chapter 168 of said chapter 175, as most recently 
46 amended by section 80 of said chapter 358, is hereby amended by striking out the words “The 
47 commissioner may, upon the payment of the fee prescribed by section 14, issue to any suitable 
48 persons aged 18 or older, a license to act as a special insurance broker to negotiate, continue or 
49 renew contracts of insurance against any of the hazards specified in section 47, except as 
50 specified in clause Fifteenth thereof, and except accident and health, workers’ compensation, 
51 compulsory motor vehicle  liability, with the exception of both motor vehicle policies for 
52 transportation network vehicles and any contracts that directly or indirectly provide insurance or 
53 other forms of protection, including , without limitation, collision damage waivers,  for vehicles 
54 and vehicle drivers engaged. In personal vehicle sharing through a personal vehicle sharing 
55 program, and life insurance on property or interests in the commonwealth with an unauthorized 

4 of 15 56 company upon the following condition" and inserting in place thereof the following words:-  The 
57 commissioner may, upon the payment of the fee prescribed by section 14, issue to any suitable 
58 persons aged 18 or older, a license to act as a special insurance broker to negotiate, continue or 
59 renew contracts of insurance against any of the hazards specified in section 47, except as 
60 specified in clause Fifteenth thereof, and except accident and health, workers’ compensation, 
61 compulsory motor vehicle liability with the exception of motor vehicle policies for transportation 
62 network vehicles, and life insurance on property or interests. In the commonwealth with an 
63 unauthorized company upon the following conditions:. 
64  SECTION 4.  Said section 168 of said chapter 175, as amended by section 81 of said 
65 chapter 358, is hereby further amended by striking out subsections (i) and (j) and inserting in 
66 place thereof the following subsection:-  
67  (i) The commissioner may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this section. 
68  SECTION 6. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
69 following 8 sections:- 
70  Section 230.  As used in sections 1 to 7 inclusive, the following words shall, unless the 
71 context requires otherwise,  have the following meanings:- 
72  “Peer-to-peer car sharing” , the authorized use of a vehicle by an individual other than the 
73 vehicle’s owner through a peer-to-peer car sharing program. Peer-to-peer car sharing shall not 
74 include  rental car or rental activity as defined in section 32E1/2 of chapter 90. 

5 of 15 75  “Peer-to-peer car sharing program”,  a business platform that connects vehicle owners 
76 with drivers to enable the sharing of vehicles for financial consideration. Peer-to-peer car sharing 
77 program does not mean rental car company as defined in section 32E1/2 of chapter 90. 
78  This Act is intended to govern the intersection of peer-to-peer car services and the state-
79 regulated business of insurance. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to extend beyond 
80 insurance or have any implications for other provisions of the code of this state, including but not 
81 limited to, those related to motor vehicle regulation, airport regulation, or taxation. 
82  “Car sharing program agreement” means the terms and conditions applicable to a shared 
83 vehicle owner and a shared vehicle driver that govern the use of a shared vehicle through a peer-
84 to-peer car sharing program. Car sharing program agreement shall not include rental car 
85 agreement, or similar, as defined in section 32E1/2 of said chapter 90. 
86  “Shared vehicle”,  a vehicle that is available for sharing through a peer-to-peer car 
87 sharing program. Shared vehicle shall not include  rental car or rental vehicle as defined in 
88 section 32E1/2 of said chapter 90 
89  “Shared vehicle driver”, an individual who has been authorized to drive the shared 
90 vehicle by the shared vehicle owner under a car sharing program agreement. 
91  “Shared vehicle owner”, the registered owner, or a person or entity designated by the 
92 registered owner, of a vehicle made available for sharing to shared vehicle drivers through a 
93 peer-to-peer car sharing program. 

6 of 15 94  “Car sharing delivery period “, the period of time during which a shared vehicle is being 
95 delivered to the location of the car sharing start time, if applicable, as documented by the 
96 governing car sharing program agreement. 
97  “Car sharing period” ,  the period of time that commences with the car sharing delivery 
98 period or, if there is no car sharing delivery period, that commences with the car sharing start 
99 time and in either case ends at the car sharing termination time. 
100  “Car sharing start time”,  the time when the shared vehicle becomes subject to the control 
101 of the shared vehicle driver at or after the time the reservation of a shared vehicle is scheduled to 
102 begin as documented in the records of a peer–to–peer car sharing program. 
103  “Car sharing termination time” , the earliest of the following events: 
104  (1) The expiration of the agreed upon period of time established for the use of a shared 
105 vehicle according to the terms of the car sharing program agreement if the shared vehicle is 
106 delivered to the location agreed upon in the car sharing program agreement; 
107  (2) When the shared vehicle is returned to a location as alternatively agreed upon by the 
108 shared vehicle owner and shared vehicle driver as communicated through a peer-to-peer car 
109 sharing program; or 
110  (3) When the shared vehicle owner or the shared vehicle owner’s authorized designee, 
111 takes possession and control of the shared vehicle. 
112  Section 231. (a) A peer-to-peer car sharing program shall assume liability, except as 
113 provided in subsection (b) of this chapter, of a shared vehicle owner for bodily injury or property 
114 damage to third parties or uninsured and underinsured motorist or personal injury protection 

7 of 15 115 losses during the car sharing period in an amount stated in the peer-to-peer car sharing program 
116 agreement which amount may not be less than those set forth in sections 34A to 34R, inclusive 
117 of chapter 90. 
118  (b) Notwithstanding the definition of “Car sharing termination time” as set forth in 
119 section 230 and this section , the assumption of liability under this subsection  does not apply to 
120 any shared vehicle owner when: 
121  (1) A shared vehicle owner makes an intentional or fraudulent material 
122 misrepresentation or omission to the peer-to-peer car sharing program before the car sharing 
123 period in which the loss occurred, or 
124  (2) Acting in concert with a shared vehicle driver who fails to return the shared 
125 vehicle pursuant to the terms of car sharing program agreement. 
126  (c) Notwithstanding the definition of “car sharing termination time” as set forth in 
127 section 1 or 2 of this section, the assumption of liability under subsection (a) of this section 
128 would apply to bodily injury, property damage, uninsured and underinsured motorist or personal 
129 injury protection losses by damaged third parties required by section 34A to 34N, inclusive of 
130 chapter 90. 
131  (d) A peer-to-peer car sharing program shall ensure that, during each car sharing 
132 period, the shared vehicle owner and the shared vehicle driver are insured under a motor vehicle 
133 liability insurance policy that provides insurance coverage in amounts no less than the minimum 
134 amounts set forth in section34M of Chapter 90 and: 

8 of 15 135  (1) recognizes that the shared vehicle insured under the policy is made available and 
136 used through a peer-to-peer car sharing program; or 
137  (2) does not exclude use of a shared vehicle by a shared vehicle driver. 
138  (e) The insurance described under subsection (d) may be satisfied by motor vehicle 
139 liability insurance maintained by: 
140  (1) a shared vehicle owner; 
141  (2) a shared vehicle driver; 
142  (3) a peer-to-peer car sharing program; or 
143  (4) both a shared vehicle owner, a shared vehicle driver, and a peer-to-peer car 
144 sharing program. 
145  (f) The insurance described in subsection (e) that is satisfying the insurance 
146 requirement of subsection (d) shall be primary during each car sharing period. 
147  (g) The peer-to-peer car sharing program shall assume primary liability for a claim 
148 when it is in whole or in part providing the insurance required under subsections (d) and (e) and: 
149  (1) a dispute exists as to who was in control of the shared motor vehicle at the time of 
150 the loss; and 
151  (2) the peer-to-peer car sharing program does not have available, did not retain, or 
152 fails to provide the information required by section  234. 

9 of 15 153  The shared motor vehicle’s insurer shall indemnify the car sharing program to the extent 
154 of its obligation under, if any, the applicable insurance policy, if it is determined that the shared 
155 motor vehicle’s owner was in control of the shared motor vehicle at the time of the loss. 
156  (h) If insurance maintained by a shared vehicle owner or shared vehicle driver in 
157 accordance with subsection (e) has lapsed or does not provide the required coverage, insurance 
158 maintained by a peer-to-peer car sharing program shall provide the coverage required by 
159 subsection (d) beginning with the first dollar of a claim and have the duty to defend such claim 
160 except under circumstances as set forth in clause (1) of paragraph (b) of section 230. 
161  (i) Coverage under an automobile insurance policy maintained by the peer-to-peer 
162 car sharing program shall not be dependent on another automobile insurer first denying a claim 
163 nor shall another automobile insurance policy be required to first deny a claim. 
164  (j) Nothing in this chapter shall : 
165  (1) limit the liability of the peer-to-peer car sharing program for any act or omission 
166 of the peer-to-peer car sharing program itself that results in injury to any person as a result of the 
167 use of a shared vehicle through a peer-to-peer car sharing program; or 
168  (2) limit the ability of the peer-to-peer car sharing program to, by contract, seek 
169 indemnification from the shared vehicle owner or the shared vehicle driver for economic loss 
170 sustained by the peer-to-peer car sharing program resulting from a breach of the terms and 
171 conditions of the car sharing program agreement. 
172  Section 232.  At the time when a vehicle owner registers as a shared vehicle owner on a 
173 peer-to-peer car sharing program and prior to the time when the shared vehicle owner makes a 

10 of 15 174 shared vehicle available for car sharing on the peer-to-peer car sharing program, the peer-to-peer 
175 car sharing program shall notify the shared vehicle owner that, if the shared vehicle has a lien 
176 against it, the use of the shared vehicle through a peer-to-peer car sharing program, including use 
177 without physical damage coverage, may violate the terms of the contract with the lienholder. 
178  Section 233. (a) An authorized insurer that writes motor vehicle liability insurance in the 
179 commonwealth  may exclude any and all coverage and the duty to defend or indemnify for any 
180 claim afforded under a shared vehicle owner’s motor vehicle liability insurance policy, 
181 including, but not limited to: 
182  (i)liability coverage for bodily injury and property damage; 
183  (ii) personal injury protection coverage as defined in section 34M of chapter 90; 
184  (iii) uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage; 
185  (1) medical payments coverage; 
186  (2) comprehensive physical damage coverage; and 
187  (3) collision physical damage coverage 
188  (b) Nothing in this section shall invalidate or limit an exclusion contained in a motor 
189 vehicle liability insurance policy, including any insurance policy in use or approved for use that 
190 excludes coverage for motor vehicles made available for rent, sharing, or hire or for any business 
191 use. 
192  Section 234. A peer-to-peer car sharing program shall collect and verify records 
193 pertaining to the use of a vehicle, including, but not limited to, times used, fees paid by the 

11 of 15 194 shared vehicle driver, and revenues received by the shared vehicle owner and provide that 
195 information upon request to the shared vehicle owner, the shared vehicle owner’s insurer, or the 
196 shared vehicle driver’s insurer to facilitate a claim coverage investigation. The peer-to-peer car 
197 sharing program shall retain the records for a time period not less than the applicable personal 
198 injury statute of limitations. 
199  Section 235. A peer-to-peer car sharing program and a shared vehicle owner shall be 
200 exempt from vicarious liability in accordance with 49 U.S.C. § 30106 and under any state or 
201 local law that imposes liability solely based on vehicle ownership. 
202  Section 236. A motor vehicle insurer that defends or indemnifies a claim against a shared 
203 vehicle that is excluded under the terms of its policy shall have the right to seek contribution 
204 against the motor vehicle insurer of the peer-to-peer car sharing program if the claim is: (1) made 
205 against the shared vehicle owner or the shared vehicle driver for loss or injury that occurs during 
206 the car sharing period; and (2) excluded under the terms of its policy. 
207  Section 237. (a) Notwithstanding the. provisions of any law, rule or regulation to the 
208 contrary, a peer-to-peer car sharing program shall have an insurable interest in a shared vehicle 
209 during the car sharing period. 
210  (b) Nothing in this section shall establish liability on a peer-to-peer car sharing program 
211 to maintain the coverage set forth in section 230.   
212  (c) A peer–to–peer car sharing program may own and maintain as the named insured 1 or 
213 more policies of motor vehicle liability insurance that provides coverage for: 

12 of 15 214  (1) liabilities assumed by the peer–to–peer car sharing program under a peer–to–peer car 
215 sharing program agreement;  
216  (2) any liability of the shared vehicle owner; or 
217  (3) damage or loss to the shared motor vehicle; or any liability of the shared vehicle 
218 driver. 
219  Section 238. Each car sharing program agreement made in the commonwealth shall 
220 disclose to the shared vehicle owner and the shared vehicle driver: 
221  (a) any right of the peer-to-peer car sharing program to seek indemnification from the 
222 shared vehicle owner or the shared vehicle driver for economic loss sustained by the peer-to-peer 
223 car sharing program resulting from a breach of the terms and conditions of the car sharing 
224 program agreement; 
225  (b) that a motor vehicle liability insurance policy issued to the shared vehicle owner for 
226 the shared vehicle or to the shared vehicle driver does not provide a defense or indemnification 
227 for any claim asserted by the peer-to-peer car sharing program; 
228  (c) that the peer-to-peer car sharing program’s insurance coverage on the shared vehicle 
229 owner and the shared vehicle driver is in effect only during each car sharing period and that, for 
230 any use of the shared vehicle by the shared vehicle driver after the car sharing termination time, 
231 the shared vehicle driver and the shared vehicle owner may not have insurance coverage; 
232  (d) the daily rate, fees, and if applicable, any insurance or protection package costs that 
233 are charged to the shared vehicle owner or the shared vehicle driver;  

13 of 15 234  (e) that the shared vehicle owner’s motor vehicle liability insurance may not provide 
235 coverage for a shared vehicle;  
236  (f) an emergency telephone number to personnel capable of fielding roadside assistance 
237 and other customer service inquiries; and  
238  (g) if there are conditions under which a shared vehicle driver must maintain a personal 
239 automobile insurance policy with certain applicable coverage limits on a primary basis in order 
240 to book a shared motor vehicle. 
241  Section 239.   (a) A peer-to-peer car sharing program may not enter into a peer-to-peer 
242 car sharing program agreement with a driver unless the driver who will operate the shared 
243 vehicle: 
244  (1) holds a driver’s license issued under section 8 of chapter 90 that authorizes the driver 
245 to operate vehicles of the class of the shared vehicle; or 
246  (2) is a nonresident who: 
247  (i) has a driver’s license issued by the state or country of the driver’s residence that 
248 authorizes the driver in that state or country to drive vehicles of the class of the shared vehicle; 
249 and 
250  (ii) is at least the same age as that required of a resident to drive; or 
251  (3) otherwise is specifically authorized to drive vehicles of the class of the shared vehicle. 
252  (b) A peer-to-peer car sharing program shall keep a record of: 
253  (1) The name and address of the shared vehicle driver; 

14 of 15 254  (2) The number of the driver’s license of the shared vehicle driver and each other person, 
255 if any, who will operate the shared vehicle; and 
256  (3) The place of issuance of the driver’s license. 
257  Section 240.  A peer-to-peer car sharing program shall have sole responsibility for any 
258 equipment, such as a GPS system or other special equipment that is put in or on the vehicle to 
259 monitor or facilitate the car sharing transaction, and shall agree to indemnify and hold harmless 
260 the vehicle owner for any damage to or theft of such equipment during the sharing period not 
261 caused by the vehicle owner. The peer- to-peer car sharing program has the right to seek 
262 indemnity from the shared vehicle driver for any loss or damage to such equipment that occurs 
263 during the sharing period. 
264  Section 241. (a) At the time when a vehicle owner registers as a shared vehicle owner on 
265 a peer-to-peer car sharing program and prior to the time when the shared vehicle owner makes a 
266 shared vehicle available for car sharing on the peer-to-peer car sharing program, the peer-to-peer 
267 car sharing program shall: 
268  (1) verify that the shared vehicle does not have any safety recalls on the vehicle for which 
269 the repairs have not been made; and 
270  (2) notify the shared vehicle owner of the requirements under subsection (b). 
271  (b) (1) If the shared vehicle owner has received an actual notice of a safety recall on the 
272 vehicle, a shared vehicle owner may not make a vehicle available as a shared vehicle on a peer-
273 to-peer car sharing program until the safety recall repair has been made. 

15 of 15 274  (2) If a shared vehicle owner receives an actual notice of a safety recall on a shared 
275 vehicle while the shared vehicle is made available on the peer-to-peer car sharing program, the 
276 shared vehicle owner shall remove the shared vehicle as available on the peer-to-peer car sharing 
277 program, as soon as practicably possible after receiving the notice of the safety recall and until 
278 the safety recall repair has been made. 
279  If a shared vehicle owner receives an actual notice of a safety recall while the shared 
280 vehicle is being used in the possession of a shared vehicle driver, as soon as practicably possible 
281 after receiving the notice of the safety recall, the shared vehicle owner shall notify the peer-to-
282 peer car sharing program about the safety recall so that the shared vehicle owner may address the 
283 safety recall repair. 
284  SECTION 7. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.